Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2167.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1376(a), (a.1), (a.2), (b), (c.2), (c.3), (c.4), (c.5), (c.6), (c.7), (c.9) and (e), 1377(c) and (d), 1377.1, 1377.2 and 1383(d) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1376. Cost of Tuition and Maintenance of Certain Exceptional Children in Approved Institutions.--(a) When any child between school entry age and twenty-one (21) years of age and resident in this Commonwealth, who is blind or deaf, or has cerebral palsy and/or neurological impairment and/or muscular dystrophy and/or is intellectually disabled and/or has a serious 1234567891011121314151617181920 emotional disability and/or has autism/pervasive developmental disorder and is enrolled, with the approval of the Department of Education, as a pupil in an approved [private] special education school approved by the Department of Education, in accordance with standards and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education, the school district in which such child is resident or, for students placed by a charter school, the charter school in which the student was enrolled shall pay the greater of either twenty per centum (20%) of the actual audited cost of tuition and maintenance of such child in such school, as determined by the Department of Education, or its "tuition charge per elementary pupil" or its "tuition charge per high school pupil," as calculated pursuant to section 2561, and the Commonwealth shall pay, out of funds appropriated to the department for special education, the balance due for the costs of such child's tuition and maintenance, as determined by the department. For the school years 1989-1990, 1990-1991 and 1991-1992, the school district payment shall be no greater than forty percent (40%) of the actual audited costs of tuition and maintenance of such child in such school. For the 1992-1993 school year through the 2003-2004 school year, the school district or charter school payment shall be the greater of forty percent (40%) of the actual audited costs of tuition and maintenance of such child in such school, as determined by the Department of Education, or its "tuition charge per elementary pupil" or its "tuition charge per high school pupil," as calculated pursuant to section 2561, and the Commonwealth shall pay, out of funds appropriated to the department for approved [private] special education schools, the balance due for the costs of such child's tuition and maintenance, as determined by 20260HB2167PN2809 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department. For the 2004-2005 school year and each school year thereafter, the school district or charter school payment shall be the greater of forty percent (40%) of the approved tuition rate as established pursuant to subsection (c.3) or (c.5) or the school district or charter school's "tuition charges per elementary pupil" or "tuition charges per secondary pupil" as calculated under section 2561, and the Commonwealth shall pay out of funds appropriated to the department for approved [private] special education schools the balance of the approved tuition rate due for the cost of such child's tuition and maintenance. The department will credit the district of residence with average daily membership for such child consistent with the rules of procedure developed in accordance with section 2501. If the residence of such child in a particular school district cannot be determined, the Commonwealth shall pay the whole cost of tuition and maintenance of such child as established under subsection (c.3) or (c.5).(a.1) For the 2004-2005 school year, the following shall apply:(1) The Department of Education shall determine the payment amount for each approved [private] special education school for all students enrolled in an approved [private] special education school for the 2003-2004 school year based on the average of:(i) The preliminary budget submitted to the Department of Education by the approved [private] special education school for the 2004-2005 school year.(ii) The midyear budget submitted to the Department of Education by the approved [private] special education school for the 2003-2004 school year.(iii) The audit issued by the Governor's Office of the 20260HB2167PN2809 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Budget for the 2002-2003 school year, excluding questioned costs.(2) Where the 2002-2003 audit is not available, the Department of Education shall use the claim form submitted to it by the approved [private] special education school for the 2002-2003 school year. In the event that an approved [private] special education school has not submitted a claim form for the 2002-2003 school year, the Department of Education shall use the audit or, where the audit is not available, the claim form for the 2001-2002 school year.(3) For the purposes of determining the payment under paragraph (1) for an approved [private] special education school that was not in operation for the 2002-2003 school year, the Department of Education shall utilize the approved [private] special education school's preliminary budget for the 2004-2005 school year instead of the audit identified under paragraph (1)(iii).(4) No later than August 10, 2004, the Department of Education shall notify each school district of residence or charter school of a child enrolled in an approved [private] special education school of its payment amount under subsection (a).(5) The Department of Education shall pay each approved [private] special education school the total amount calculated pursuant to this subsection divided into twelve (12) monthly payments. The Department of Education shall withhold the school district or charter school payment amount calculated under subsection (a) from the amount of any and all State payments made to the school district or charter school. In no event shall the sum of the Commonwealth's share of payments to approved 20260HB2167PN2809 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [private] special education schools under this subsection exceed the appropriation for approved [private] special education schools.(a.2) For the 2005-2006 school year and each school year thereafter, the Department of Education shall determine the payment amount for each approved [private] special education school for all students enrolled in an approved [private] special education school for the prior school year as follows:(1) (i) Multiply the payment determined for the immediate preceding school year by one hundred and twenty-five percent (125%) of the percentage increase in the appropriation for special education for the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which payments under this subsection are made.(ii) Add the product from subparagraph (i) to the payment determined for the immediate preceding school year.(2) No later than May 10, 2005, and no later than May 10 of each year thereafter, the Department of Education shall notify each school district of residence or charter school of a child enrolled in an approved [private] special education school of its payment amount under subsection (a).(3) The Department of Education shall pay each approved [private] special education school the total amount calculated pursuant to this subsection divided into twelve (12) monthly payments. The Department of Education shall withhold the school district or charter school payment amount calculated under subsection (a) from the amount of any and all State payments made to the school district or charter school. In no event shall the sum of the Commonwealth's share of payments to approved [private] special education schools under this subsection exceed the appropriation for approved [private] special education 20260HB2167PN2809 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 schools.(b) When any person less than school entry age or more than twenty-one (21) years of age and resident in this Commonwealth, who is blind or deaf, or has cerebral palsy and/or has neurological impairment and/or has muscular dystrophy, or has autism/pervasive developmental delay, and is enrolled, with the approval of the Department of Education, as a pupil in an approved [private] special education school approved by the Department of Education, the Commonwealth shall pay to such school the approved tuition rate for such child's tuition and maintenance, and in addition, in the case of any child less than school entry age, who is blind, the cost, as determined by the Department of Education of instructing the parent of such blind child in caring for such child.(c.2) (4) Beginning with the 2004-2005 school year and each school year thereafter, each approved [private] special education school shall maintain an accounting and bookkeeping system and be subject to audit as provided in standards promulgated by the Department of Education. Such standards shall require that each approved [private] special education school submit an audit to the Department of Education by November 1 of each year. Such audit shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted accounting standards by an independent certified public accountant. Such standards shall include a definition of administrative costs, which costs shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of each approved [private] special education school's total costs.(5) (i) Where the amount of an approved [private] special education school's reportable costs in the 2004-2005 fiscal year 20260HB2167PN2809 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is less than the amount of revenues received by the approved [private] special education school for the 2004-2005 fiscal year from the Commonwealth for the provision of educational services to children who have been approved by the Department of Education, the difference may be retained by the approved [private] special education school for use in the 2005-2006 fiscal year.(ii) Beginning in the 2005-2006 fiscal year, where the amount of reportable costs in a fiscal year is less than the amount of revenues received in that fiscal year by the approved [private] special education school from the Commonwealth for the provision of educational services to children who have been approved by the Department of Education, the approved [private] special education school shall remit the difference to the Commonwealth. Any such funds shall be deposited in the Audit Resolution Fund for the resolution of previous audits.(6) Audits of cost reports submitted for school years prior to the 2004-2005 school year shall be completed in a manner consistent with prior audit practices. An approved [private] special education school may submit an audit for the 2003-2004 school year prepared by an independent certified public accountant provided the following have occurred:(i) The Department of Education has failed to process and settle the cost reports within twelve (12) months from submission by the approved [private] special education school.(ii) The Department of Education has failed to settle any appeals or postsettlement resolution within fifteen (15) months from submission by the approved [private] special education school.(iii) The approved [private] special education school has 20260HB2167PN2809 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responded to reasonable requests for information and documents by the Department of Education.Upon receipt of the independent audit for the 2003-2004 school year, the Department of Education shall have three (3) months to review the audit and settle any outstanding payments due to or from the approved [private] special education school.(c.3) For payments made during the 2004-2005 school year, the Department of Education shall establish an approved tuition rate for each approved [private] special education school by dividing the amount calculated under subsection (a.1) by the full-time equivalent enrollment for the approved [private] special education school for the 2003-2004 school year. This calculation shall be adjusted for residential and non-residential students. The approved tuition rate multiplied by the full-time equivalent enrollment shall not exceed the amount calculated under subsection (a.1).(c.4) Beginning August 15, 2004, and no later than August 15 of each year thereafter, each approved [private] special education school shall submit budget information for the current school year on forms and in a manner determined by the Department of Education. The budget information shall include a proposed tuition rate or rates and projected full-time equivalent enrollment for the current year. An approved [private] special education school may submit separate proposed tuition rates for up to three levels of services and for day and residential students, pursuant to the guidelines established under subsection (c.7).(c.5) For payments made during the 2005-2006 school year and each school year thereafter, beginning January 15, 2005, and no later than January 15 of each year thereafter, the Department of 20260HB2167PN2809 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Education shall establish an approved tuition rate or rates and full-time equivalent enrollment for each approved [private] special education school for the current school year. Where an approved [private] special education school has submitted one tuition rate, the approved tuition rate shall be determined by dividing the amount calculated under subsection (a.2) by the full-time equivalent enrollment for the approved [private] special education school for the prior school year. Where an approved [private] special education school has submitted more than one tuition rate, the sum of the products of each approved tuition rate and corresponding full-time equivalent enrollment for the approved [private] special education school for the prior school year shall equal the amount calculated under subsection (a.2). An approved [private] special education school may enroll students in excess of the approved full-time equivalent enrollment. Where an approved [private] special education school enrolls students in excess of the approved full-time equivalent enrollment, it must show a corresponding decrease in its approved tuition rate.(c.6) No later than May 1, 2005, and May 1 of each school year thereafter, the department shall annually publish a report on the department's publicly accessible World Wide Web site that shall include, but not be limited to:(1) The approved tuition rate or rates for each approved [private] special education school for the current school year.(2) A description of the exceptionalities each approved [private] special education school is approved to serve.(3) A description of all programs and services offered by each approved [private] special education school.(c.7) No later than November 1, 2004, the Department of 20260HB2167PN2809 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Education shall issue guidelines establishing the levels of services to assist each approved [private] special education school in determining its proposed tuition rate or rates. The guidelines shall allow an approved [private] special education school to establish approved tuition rates for up to three levels of services and for day and residential students.* * *(c.9) Beginning with audited data for the 2016-2017 school year, the total of the amounts remitted to the Commonwealth under subsection (c.2)(5)(ii) shall be distributed to each approved [private] special education school with reportable costs that exceed the amount of revenue received as follows:(1) Subtract the amount of revenue received under subsection (a.2) from the reportable costs in the audit submitted to the Department of Education under subsection (c.2)(4).(2) Multiply the amount in paragraph (1) by the lesser of the total of the amounts remitted to the Commonwealth under subsection (c.2)(5)(ii) or the total of the amounts in paragraph (1).(3) Divide the amount in paragraph (2) by the total of the amounts in paragraph (1).(4) Funds distributed under this subsection shall be paid in May of the following school year.(5) Funds distributed under this subsection shall not be included in determining the payment amount under subsection (a.2).* * *(e) The following words and phrases as used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2167PN2809 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Approved full-time equivalent enrollment" means the full-time equivalent enrollment set by the Department of Education pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c.3) or (c.5)."Approved tuition rate" means the final tuition rate set by the Department of Education pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c.3) or (c.5)."Audit," for the purpose of subsection (a.1), means the fiscal audit issued by the Governor's Office of the Budget, excluding questioned costs."Claim form," for the purpose of subsection (a.1), means the form that each approved [private] special education school submitted following the end of the fiscal year showing the final costs claimed for the fiscal year."Current school year" means the year in which payment is being made."Full-time equivalent enrollment" means the number of students enrolled in an approved [private] special education school pursuant to subsection (a) or (b)."Independent certified public accountant" means a member of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants that has a minimum of five (5) years' verifiable experience in performing audits of government funds for nonprofit organizations with a comparable or larger annual budget."Midyear budget," for the purpose of subsection (a.1), means the adjusted budget for the 2003-2004 school year submitted by each approved [private] special education school in January 2004."Preliminary budget," for the purpose of subsection (a.1), means the budget for the 2004-2005 school year submitted by each approved [private] special education school in June 2004.20260HB2167PN2809 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Prior school year" means the year for which payment is made during the current year."Proposed tuition rate" means the amount submitted by each approved [private] special education school to the Department of Education to be used in establishing the cost that the approved [private] special education school incurred to provide instructional and residential services for each full-time equivalent student. An approved [private] special education school may submit information to establish costs for up to three (3) levels of services and for day and residential students.Section 1377. Payment of Cost of Tuition and Maintenance of Certain Children with Disabilities.--* * *(c) For the purpose of enabling the Department of Education to determine from time to time what amounts are due to schools for the visually impaired or hearing impaired or for the cerebral palsied and/or brain injured and/or muscular dystrophied or for the socially and emotionally disabled and/or intellectually disabled hereunder, such schools shall forward to the department, at such times and in such form as the department shall prescribe, sworn statements setting forth the names, ages, and residences of all pupils enrolled hereunder, specifying the school districts liable for a part of the cost of tuition and maintenance of any such pupils, the per capita cost of and maintenance of pupils, and such other information as the department shall require.For the purpose of providing adequate administration of the program and to carry out the preaudit functions authorized in section 1376(a), one-half of one percent (.50%) of the total appropriations for approved [private] special education schools from all funds shall be allocated to the Department of 20260HB2167PN2809 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Education.(d) When, during the course of the 1982-1983 school year, programs for children with disabilities are caused to be transferred from schools or institutions for the visually impaired or hearing impaired, or cerebral palsied or brain injured or muscular dystrophied or intellectually disabled, or socially and emotionally disabled, as provided for in sections 1376 and 1376.1, to school districts or intermediate units, as provided for in sections 2509 and 2509.1, under unanticipated or emergency circumstances, and when such transfers necessitate the transfer of funds from the appropriation to the Department of Education for special education for approved [private] special education schools to the appropriation to the Department of Education for payments on account of special education of children with disabilities in public schools, the Secretary of Education shall be empowered so to transfer such funds, upon approval of the Secretary of the Budget and written notification to the State Treasurer and the chairmen of the House and Senate Appropriations and Education Committees.Section 1377.1. Transfer of Funds for Transferal Programs.--When, during the course of a school year or after the end of a school year, programs for children with disabilities are caused to be transferred from schools or institutions for the visually impaired or hearing impaired, or cerebral palsied or brain injured or muscular dystrophied or intellectually disabled, or socially and emotionally disabled, as provided for in sections 1376 and 1376.1, to school districts or intermediate units, as provided for in sections 2509 and 2509.1, and when such transfers necessitate the transfer of funds from the appropriation to the Department of Education for special 20260HB2167PN2809 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education for approved [private] special education schools to the appropriation to the Department of Education for payments on account of special education of children with disabilities in public schools, the Secretary of Education shall be empowered to transfer such funds, upon approval of the Secretary of the Budget and written notification to the State Treasurer and the chairmen of the House and Senate Appropriations and Education Committees.Section 1377.2. Emergency Permits at Approved [Private] Special Education Schools and Chartered Schools for the Deaf and Blind.--Approved [private] special education schools and chartered schools for the deaf and blind shall have the authority to apply for emergency permits through the Department of Education pursuant to the criteria for eligibility established under 22 Pa. Code § 49.31 (relating to criteria for eligibility) as if the teachers were employed by a public school entity, provided that all other conditions for obtaining an emergency permit are met.Section 1383. Extended Special Education Enrollment Due to COVID-19.--* * *(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"IEP." An individualized education program established under 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, approved [private] special education school or chartered school for the education of the deaf and blind.20260HB2167PN2809 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. The definition of "school entity" in section 1301-B of the act is amended to read:Section 1301-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meaning given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school, approved [private] special education school, chartered school for the education of the deaf or the blind or private residential rehabilitative institution.Section 3. Sections 2502.51(d)(1), 2509.5(f) and 2561(8) of the act are amended to read:Section 2502.51. Basic Education Funding for 2011-2012 School Year.--* * *(d) The following shall apply:(1) (i) Funds received by a school district under subsection (a)(3)(ii)(A) shall be used to satisfy judgments and past-due accounts payable beyond ninety (90) or more days, including health care benefits, payments to charter schools, payments to approved [private] special education schools and payments to intermediate units.(ii) If all judgments have been satisfied and past-due accounts paid, funds may be used for timely payment of health care benefits, payments to charter schools, payments to approved [private] special education schools, payments to intermediate units and for other expenses approved by the Secretary of Education to ensure the fiscal stability of the school district.* * *20260HB2167PN2809 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2509.5. Special Education Payments to School Districts.--* * *(f) The Secretary of Education shall develop a definition of severely classified exceptional students by September 20, 1996. This definition may include the primary exceptionality, level of intervention, type of support and related services requirements elements currently collected through the PennData system. This definition shall not include students who are institutionalized, in approved [private] special education school placements, in detention home programs, in mentally gifted programs or in early intervention programs operated under the provisions of the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1372, No.212), known as the "Early Intervention Services System Act." This definition shall be submitted to the majority chairman and the minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee and the Education Committee of the Senate and the majority chairman and the minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee and the Education Committee of the House of Representatives for review and comment no later than September 20, 1996. No sooner than fifteen (15) days and not later than thirty (30) days after submission of the proposed definition to the committees, the Secretary of Education shall approve a definition of severely classified exceptional students.* * *Section 2561. Tuition Charges for Pupils of Other Districts.--A school district receiving elementary or high school pupils or career and technical or other extension education pupils who are residents of another school district shall compute the tuition charges as follows:* * *20260HB2167PN2809 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) Charter School Tuition Charge. When a charter school established pursuant to Article XVII-A enrolls any eligible student in an approved [private] special education school pursuant to section 1376, its "tuition charge per elementary pupil" or its "tuition charge per secondary pupil" shall be calculated in accordance with clauses (1) through (3).Section 4. No later than 30 days after the effective date of this section, the State Board of Education shall initiate the promulgation of a final-omitted regulation in accordance with the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, to change the term "approved private school" to "approved special education school" in 22 Pa. Code Ch. 14. No other changes shall be included in the final-omitted regulation.Section 5. No later than 60 days after the effective date of this section, the Department of Education shall initiate the promulgation of a final-omitted regulation in accordance with the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, to change the term "approved private school" to "approved special education school" in 22 Pa. Code Chs. 171 and 711. No other changes shall be included in the final-omitted regulation.Section 6. A reference in statute or regulation to an "approved private school" shall be deemed a reference to an "approved special education school."Section 7. An appropriation in a General Appropriation Act made for "special education - approved private schools" shall be deemed to be an appropriation made for "special education - approved special education schools."Section 8. Upon the effective date of this section, an 20260HB2167PN2809 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved private school shall be deemed to be an approved special education school.Section 9. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2167PN2809 - 18 - 123